Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1474.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2007-H. Requirements for significant reduction of operations of State-related universities.(a) Legislative findings.--The General Assembly finds as follows:(1) State-related universities receive substantial taxpayer funding to provide education to all Pennsylvanians.(2) The closure of branch campuses disproportionately harms rural and underprivileged communities, limiting access 1234567891011121314151617181920 to affordable higher education.(3) Taxpayer-supported institutions of higher education have a duty to maintain equitable geographic access to education.(4) There is a need to ensure that branch campuses cannot be closed without legislative oversight and public input.(b) Proposed implementation plan.--Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year and continuing each school year thereafter, a board shall develop a proposed implementation plan prior to the consolidation, transfer, closure or significant reduction of operations of the State-related university, including the closure of a branch campus. The proposed implementation plan shall include the following information:(1) a detailed financial analysis;(2) an economic impact study detailing the effects on the local community;(3) a student impact report, including the number of students affected and educational alternatives available to the student; and(4) a plan of higher education access for students in the affected region.(c) Distribution of plan.--The board shall transmit a copy of the proposed implementation plan to the following:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate.20250HB1474PN1735 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.(5) Any member of the General Assembly who has an affected campus of a State-related university within the boundaries of the legislative district the member represents.(d) Public comment period.--(1) The board shall make the proposed implementation plan available for review and solicit public comment for a period of not less than 90 days.(2) The board shall consult with stakeholders, including faculty, staff, students, administrators, local businesses and community leaders and hold at least three public hearings on the proposed implementation plan as part of the public comment period. After the public comment period and before any action may be taken, the board shall consider comments made by stakeholders during the public comment period and present an implementation plan at a public meeting subject to approval by two-thirds of the board.(e) Legislative action required.--(1) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year and continuing each school year thereafter, if the plan involves consolidation, transfer, closure or significant reduction in operations, including closure of a branch campus and the board approves the plan, the State-related university shall submit the plan to the Secretary of the Senate and Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives for approval by the General Assembly.(2) A State-related university that is required to submit a plan may not implement the plan unless the General Assembly approves the plan.20250HB1474PN1735 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board of trustees" or "board." The board of trustees of a State-related university."State-related university." The Pennsylvania State University, the University of Pittsburgh, Temple University, Lincoln University and their branch campuses."Student." An individual who is enrolled on a full-time or part-time basis at a State-related university.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1474PN1735 - 4 - 1234567891011